New Jersey, session 221, S2595.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Agriculture shall establish a bee-friendly habitat pilot program to encourage homeowners and businesses to convert their lawns into bee-friendly habitats in order to support and protect the population of bees in the State.  The department shall administer the pilot program for one year following the effective date of this section.  The program shall provide a reimbursement of up to $250 for a homeowner and a reimbursement of up to $500 for a business.  Reimbursement awards totaling an amount not to exceed $1 million shall be awarded during the pilot program. b.    In establishing the pilot program pursuant to this section, the department shall: (1)   develop guidelines and procedures for the submission of applications by homeowners and businesses to receive a reimbursement from the program; (2)   establish criteria for a homeowner or business to qualify for a reimbursement from the program; (3)   develop and maintain an Internet website or webpage providing information on how to start and manage a bee-friendly habitat and information about the pilot program; and (4)   create a list of approved native plants, other plants, forbs, or legumes that would qualify for reimbursement. c.  No later than six months after the completion of the pilot program, submit a written report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature summarizing: (1)   the number of homeowners and business who received reimbursement under the pilot program and the amount of money distributed to homeowners and businesses; (2)   the effectiveness of the pilot program in assisting with the development of bee-friendly habitat; (3)   any recommendations concerning the need for a program or additional funding to encourage the establishment of bee-friendly habitats; and (4)   any other information that the department considers relevant in assessing the pilot program. d.    As used in this section: "Bee-friendly habitat" means a lawn that has been converted to provide a sufficient proportion of plants, forbs, or legumes to provide a steady supply of food to pollinating bees. Department means Department of Agriculture. 2.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Agriculture the sum of $1 million to be used for the purposes of providing reimbursements to homeowners and businesses pursuant to section 1 of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.